Massachusetts, session 194th, H2750.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Neal Bryan Martin shall be a member of the North Adams retirement
system, which is the retirement system for the employees of the regional Hoosac water quality
district, whose two member communities are the city of North Adams and the town of
Williamstown. The North Adams retirement system serves the employees of the Hoosac water
quality district, the non-teaching staff of the Northern Berkshire vocational regional school and
the employees of the city of North Adams and the North Adams housing authority.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding chapter 32 of the General Laws or any other general or
special law to the contrary, the North Adams retirement board shall credit Neal Bryan Martin
with not more than 18.5 years of creditable service for his full-time work with the Hoosac water
quality district between April 4, 1988 and December 8, 2006, for the purpose of determining his
superannuation retirement allowance pursuant to said chapter 32. The board shall confirm the
exact dates of Neal Bryan Martin’s employment and credit him with creditable service for the
of 2

amount of actual time of employment during this period in accordance with section 4 of said
chapter 32. Neal Bryan Martin’s superannuation retirement allowance shall be calculated as
provided for in subdivision (2) of section 5 of said chapter 32, as if he were a member classified
in Group 1 and as if he retired at age 65.
of 2